District of Columbia statutes.
16-1115

Conclusiveness of final judgment.

A final judgment rendered in an action of ejectment is conclusive as to the title thereby established as between the parties to the action and all persons claiming under them since the commencement of the action.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 567, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1115.
1973 Ed., § 16-1115.